Massachusetts, session 194th, S1934.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Chapter 10 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2020 Official Edition, is hereby
amended by inserting after section 35PPP the following section:-
Section 35QQQ. There shall be established and set up on the books of the
Commonwealth a separate fund to be known as the Massachusetts Law Enforcement Memorial
Fund to be used without appropriation by a department of public safety for the purpose of
making annual payments to the Massachusetts Law Enforcement Memorial to memorialize and
honor Massachusetts law enforcement personnel killed in the line of duty. There shall be credited
to the fund revenues received by the Commonwealth from the sale of registration plates under
section 2G of chapter 90.
of 1